Idaho statutes. Title 20 STATE PRISON AND COUNTY JAILS
Chapter 2 STATE BOARD OF CORRECTION
§ 20-216. Records, reports and statistics.

The board shall keep a record of and require reports from all persons on parole or probation and enforce observance of rules and regulations for parole or probation established by the commission or the courts. It shall prepare and publish reports and statistics relating to probation and parole and it shall submit to the governor, at such times as the governor may direct, but at least annually, a full and complete report of the board and its agents, showing the disposition of all cases coming before the board or the commission and such additional information relating thereto as the governor may request.

The board and the department of health and welfare shall submit a joint report to the legislature by January 15 each year analyzing:

The criminogenic needs of the active population of probationers and parolees;

Current funding available to deliver effective, evidence-based programming to address those needs; and

Any gap in funding to meet the treatment needs of all moderate and high-risk probationers and parolees.

By November 15, 2015, and biennially on November 15 thereafter, the board shall develop and deliver a report to the governor and the legislature on the programs to reduce recidivism that are funded by the state. Subject to the availability of moneys, the board may contract with an independent contractor or academic institution for this purpose. The report shall include an evaluation of the quality of each program and its likelihood to reduce recidivism among program participants and shall include a plan for program improvements by the board. The program evaluations shall ensure that treatment programs are delivering services in a way that aligns with the scientifically based research to reduce recidivism. Program evaluation shall be standardized and a validated program assessment tool shall be used. Each program evaluation shall include a site visit and interviews with key staff, interviews with offenders, group observation and file and material review. The information shall be compiled into a composite score indicating adherence to concepts that are linked with program effectiveness, such as program development, program procedures, staff, offender assessment, treatment processes and programs and quality assurance. Program evaluation should also include feedback to the program concerning strengths, weaknesses and recommendations for better adherence to scientifically based research and the principles of effective intervention.

For the purposes of this section:

“Program” means a treatment or intervention program or service that is intended to reduce the propensity of a person to commit crimes or improve the mental health of a person with the result of reducing the likelihood that the person will commit a crime or need emergency mental health services. “Program” does not mean or include an educational program or service that an agency is required to provide to meet educational requirements imposed by state law or a program that provides basic medical services.

“Scientifically based research” means research that obtains reliable and valid knowledge by:

Employing systematic, empirical methods that draw on observation or experiment;
(ii) Involving rigorous data analyses that are adequate to test the stated hypotheses and justify the general conclusions drawn; and

Relying on measurements or observational methods that provide reliable and valid data across evaluators and observers, across multiple measurements and observations and across studies by the same or different investigators.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 16, p. 59; am. 1969, ch. 419, § 4, p. 1160; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 2, p. 768; am. 2014, ch. 150, § 8, p. 414.

§ 20-217. Vice-chairman, powers and duties

Consulting psychiatrist for state institutions, expenses and per diem. [Repealed.]

§ 20-217A. Appointment of director — Salary — Powers and duties.

The board shall appoint a director of correction, referred to in this chapter as the director, of the Idaho state penitentiary whose salary shall be determined and set by the board. The director shall be the chief administrative officer for the board and business manager of the penitentiary and the properties used in connection therewith. The director shall assume all the authority, powers, functions and duties as may be delegated to him by the board.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-217A, as added by 1967, ch. 364, § 2, p. 1052; am. 1969, ch. 97, § 6, p. 329.

§ 20-218. Annual reports of receipts and expenditures.

The state board of correction shall annually submit to the governor and the state budget officer a full, true, and correct report of all moneys received and expended by it for correctional services.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 18, p. 59; am. 1974, ch. 6, § 5, p. 28; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 3, p. 768.

§ 20-219. Probation and parole supervision and training — Limited supervision — Rulemaking.

The state board of correction shall be charged with the duty of:

Supervising all persons convicted of a felony placed on probation to the board;

Supervising all persons released from the state penitentiary on parole;

Supervising all persons convicted of a felony released on parole or probation from other states and residing in the state of Idaho;

Program delivery, as “program” is defined in section 20-216, Idaho Code, to all persons under its probation or parole supervision based on individual criminal risk factors and specific needs;

Making such investigations as may be necessary;

Reporting alleged violations of parole in specific cases to the commission to aid in determining whether the parole should be continued or revoked;

Reporting alleged violations of the terms or conditions of probation in specific cases to the court and the prosecuting attorney to aid in determining whether the probation should be continued or revoked;

Preparing a case history record of the prisoners to assist the commission or the courts in determining if they should be paroled or should be released on probation; and

Supervising juveniles convicted as adults with a blended sentence pursuant to and in the manner described in section 19-2601A, Idaho Code.

Any person placed on probation or parole and who has been designated as a violent sexual predator pursuant to chapter 83, title 18, Idaho Code, shall be monitored with electronic monitoring technology for the duration of the person’s probation or parole period. Any person who, without authority, intentionally alters, tampers with, damages, or destroys any electronic monitoring equipment shall be guilty of a felony.

The state board of correction shall have the discretion to determine the level of supervision of all persons under its supervision, except those who are being supervised by a problem solving court. “Level of supervision” includes the determination of the following:

The frequency, location, methods and nature of contact with the supervising officer;

Testing requirements and frequency;

Contact restrictions;

Curfew restrictions; and

Reporting requirements.

Subject to the availability of moneys, caseloads for supervising officers who are supervising offenders determined by the department of correction’s validated risk assessment to be high or moderate risk of rearrest should not exceed an average of fifty (50) offenders per supervising officer.

In carrying out its duty to supervise felony probationers and parolees, the state board of correction shall use evidence-based practices, shall target the offender’s criminal risk and need factors with appropriate supervision and intervention and shall focus resources on those identified by the board as moderate-risk and high-risk offenders. The supervision shall include:

Use of validated risk and needs assessments of the offender that measure criminal risk factors, specific individual needs and driving variable supervision levels;

Use of assessment results to guide supervision responses consistent with evidence-based practices as to the level of supervision and the practices used to reduce recidivism;

Collateral and personal contacts with the offender and community that may be unscheduled and which shall occur as often as needed based on the offender’s supervision level and risk of reoffense and based on the need to stay informed of the offender’s conduct, compliance with conditions and progress in community-based intervention;

Case planning for each offender assessed as moderate to high risk to reoffend; and

Use of practical and suitable methods that are consistent with evidence-based practices to aid and encourage the offender to improve his or her conduct and circumstances so as to reduce the offender’s risk of recidivism.

The state board of correction shall provide all supervising officers with initial and ongoing training and professional development services to support the implementation of evidence-based supervision practices. All supervising officers employed as of the effective date of this section shall complete the training requirements set forth in this subsection on or before July 1, 2016. All supervising officers hired after the effective date of this section shall complete the training requirements set forth in this subsection within two (2) years of their hire date. The training and professional development services shall include:

Assessment techniques;

Case planning;

Risk reduction and intervention strategies;

Effective communication skills;

Behavioral health needs;

Application of core correctional practices, including motivational interviewing, cognitive restructuring, structured skill building, problem solving, reinforcement and use of authority;

Training for supervising officers to become trainers so as to ensure long-term and self-sufficient training capacity in the state; and

Other topics identified by the board as evidence-based practices.

The state board of correction shall promulgate rules in consultation with the Idaho supreme court to:

Establish a program of limited supervision for offenders who qualify addressing eligibility, risk and needs assessments, transfers among levels of supervision and reporting to the court and the prosecuting attorney.

Establish a matrix of swift, certain and graduated sanctions and rewards to be imposed by the board, without the necessity of a hearing, in response to corresponding violations of or compliance with the terms or conditions imposed. Sanctions for violations shall include, but are not limited to, community service, increased reporting, curfew, submission to substance use assessment, monitoring or treatment, submission to cognitive behavioral treatment, submission to an educational or vocational skills development program, submission to a period of confinement in a local correctional facility for no more than three (3) consecutive days and house arrest. Rewards for compliance shall include, but are not limited to, decreased reporting and transfer to limited supervision.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 19, p. 59; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 4, p. 768; am. 1993, ch. 101, § 2, p. 254; am. 2008, ch. 65, § 1, p. 168; am 2014, ch. 150, § 9, p. 414; am. 2015, ch. 113, § 5, p. 281; am. 2017, ch. 182, § 3, p. 414.

§ 20-219A. Impersonating a probation/parole officer, a presentence investigator or correctional officer — Official badge and identification card.

Any person who for himself or as an agent or representative of another in this state who shall unlawfully exercise or attempt to exercise the functions of, or hold themselves out to anyone as, a probation/parole officer, a presentence investigator or correctional officer, whether acting in his own behalf as an official of the court or correction, or as the authorized or unauthorized agent or representative of another, is punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or both.

It is a misdemeanor for any person who is not authorized and commissioned by the director of correction, to wear, exhibit or display in public an official badge, official uniform of a correctional officer, or identification card of the department of correction of the state of Idaho, and is punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or both.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-219A, as added by 1982, ch. 104, § 1, p. 285.

§ 20-220. Investigation and examination to precede probation or suspension of sentence.

When a probation and parole officer is available to the court, no defendant shall be placed on probation until a written report of investigation by a parole and probation officer shall have been presented to and considered by the court, and no defendant charged with a felony or indictable offense shall be released under suspension of sentence without such investigation. The parole and probation officer shall inquire into the circumstances of the offense, criminal record, social history and present condition of the defendant. Whenever practicable, such investigation shall include a physical and mental examination of the defendant. If a defendant is committed to any institution, the probation officer shall send a report of such investigation to the institution at the time of commitment.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 20, p. 59.

§ 20-221. Modification of terms or conditions of probation or suspension of sentence — Termination of probation.

By order duly entered the court may impose and may at any time modify any terms or conditions of probation or suspension of sentence. The court shall cause a copy of any such order to be delivered to the board of correction, to the prosecuting attorney and to the probationer.

Any party or the board of correction may submit to the court a request to modify the terms and conditions of probation for any probationer under the board’s supervision at any time during the period of probation. A request to modify the terms and conditions of probation shall be supported by a statement attested to under oath or signed under penalty of perjury pursuant to section 9-1406, Idaho Code, setting forth the facts upon which the request is based. The requesting party or the board, as the case may be, shall deliver a copy of the request and statement to all parties and to the board. The prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim of the request to modify the terms and conditions of probation. Any responses to a request to modify shall be filed within thirty (30) days of the date of submittal of the request. The court may, without a hearing, rule upon a request to modify based on a review of the case, the request, the statement and any responses to the request, or may schedule a hearing on the request to modify. The court shall by written order rule on the request to modify within sixty (60) days of the date of submittal of the request.

Any party or the board of correction may submit to the court a request to terminate the probation for any probationer under the board’s supervision at any time during the period of probation. A request to terminate probation shall be supported by a statement attested to under oath or signed under penalty of perjury pursuant to section 9-1406, Idaho Code, setting forth the facts upon which the request is based. The requesting party or the board, as the case may be, shall deliver a copy of the request and statement to all parties and to the board. The prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim of a request to terminate probation. Any responses to a request to terminate probation shall be filed within thirty (30) days of the date of submittal of the request. The court may, without a hearing, rule upon a request to terminate based on a review of the case, the request, the statement and any responses to the request, or may schedule a hearing on the request to terminate. The court shall rule on the request within sixty (60) days of the date of submittal of the request. A court order granting a request to terminate probation under this subsection shall be deemed a final discharge from the remaining period of probation.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 21, p. 59; am. 2014, ch. 150, § 10, p. 414.

§ 20-222. Fixed period of probation or suspension of sentence — Rearrest and revocation.

The period of probation or suspension of sentence shall be fixed by the court and may at any time be extended or terminated by the court. Such period with any extension thereof shall not exceed the maximum period for which the defendant might have been imprisoned.

At any time during probation or suspension of sentence, the court may issue a warrant for violating any of the conditions of probation or suspension of sentence and cause the defendant to be arrested. Thereupon the court, after summary hearing may revoke the probation and suspension of sentence and cause the sentence imposed to be executed, or may cause the defendant to be brought before it and may continue or revoke the probation, or may impose any sentence which originally might have been imposed at the time of conviction. In making a determination to continue or revoke probation and suspension of sentence, the court shall consider the defendant’s risks and needs and options for treatment in the community.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 22, p. 59; am. 1986, ch. 311, § 1, p. 762; am. 2014, ch. 150, § 11, p. 414.

§ 20-223. Parole and rules governing — Restrictions — Psychiatric or psychological examination.

It is the intent of the legislature to focus prison space on those who commit the most serious offenses or who have the highest likelihood of offending in the future, and the commission, consistent with the provisions of this subsection, shall promulgate rules that establish clear guidelines and procedures that retain the commission’s discretion in individual cases.

Subject to section 19-2513, Idaho Code, the commission shall have the power to establish rules in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, under which any prisoner, excepting any under sentence of death, may be allowed to go upon parole but to remain while on parole in the legal custody and under the control of the board and subject to be taken back into confinement at the direction of the commission.

Any prisoner who is granted parole under the interstate compact may be required to post a bond prior to release or prior to such acceptance under the interstate compact; such bond may be posted by the prisoner, the prisoner’s family, or other interested party. Failure to successfully complete parole may be grounds for forfeiture of the bond. Upon successful completion of parole, the amount of the bond may be returned, less an amount for administrative costs as determined by commission rule, in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. A request must be made for return of the bond within one (1) year of discharge of the offense for which the particular offender was serving parole. Funds collected through the bonding process will be placed in a separate commission receipts fund which is hereby created in the state treasury and utilized for the extradition of parole violators.

No person serving a sentence for rape, incest, committing a lewd act upon a child, crime against nature, or with an intent or an assault with intent to commit any such crimes, or whose history and conduct indicate to the commission that he is a sexually dangerous person, shall be released on parole except upon the examination and evaluation of one (1) or more psychiatrists or psychologists or mental health professionals designated for this purpose by the department of correction to be selected by the commission and such evaluation shall be duly considered by the commission in making its parole determination. The commission may, in its discretion, likewise require a similar examination and evaluation for persons serving sentences for crimes other than those above enumerated. No person making such evaluation shall be held financially responsible to any person for denial of parole by the commission or for the results of the future acts of such person if he be granted parole.

Before considering the parole of any prisoner, the commission shall ensure that a risk assessment has been conducted pursuant to section 20-224, Idaho Code, and shall afford the prisoner the opportunity to be interviewed by the commission, a commissioner or other designated commission staff. A designated report and risk assessment, prepared by commission staff or a designated department of correction employee, that is specifically to be used by the commission in making a parole determination shall be exempt from public disclosure; such reports contain information from the presentence investigation report, medical or psychological information, the results of a risk assessment, victim information, designated confidential witness information and criminal history information. A parole shall be ordered when, in the discretion of the commission, it is in the best interests of society, and the commission believes the prisoner is able and willing to fulfill the obligations of a law-abiding citizen. Such determination shall not be a reward of clemency and it shall not be considered to be a reduction of sentence or a pardon. The commission may also by its rules fix the times and conditions under which any application denied may be reconsidered. No action may be maintained against the commission and/or any of its members in any court in connection with any decision taken by the commission to parole a prisoner and neither the commission nor its members shall be liable in any way for its action with respect thereto.

In making any parole or commutation decision with respect to a prisoner, the commission shall consider the current risk assessment, criminal history, program participation, compliance and completion, institutional misconduct and other individual characteristics related to the likelihood of offending in the future, as well as the compliance of the prisoner with any order of restitution which may have been entered according to section 19-5304, Idaho Code. The commission may make compliance with such an order of restitution a condition of parole.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no provision of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, shall apply to the commission.

Subject to the limitations of this subsection and notwithstanding any fixed term of confinement or minimum period of confinement as provided in section 19-2513, Idaho Code, the commission may parole an inmate for medical reasons. A prisoner may be considered for medical parole only when the prisoner is permanently incapacitated or terminally ill and when the commission reasonably believes the prisoner no longer poses a threat to the safety of society. For the purposes of this section, “permanently incapacitated” shall mean a person who, by reason of an existing physical condition that is not terminal, is permanently and irreversibly physically incapacitated. For the purposes of this section “terminally ill” shall mean a person who has an incurable condition caused by illness or disease and who is irreversibly terminally ill.

The commission shall prepare and send to the house of representatives and senate judiciary committees annually a report containing the names, medical condition and current status of all persons granted parole pursuant to subsection (8) of this section.

The department of correction shall promulgate rules in consultation with the commission to prepare prisoners for parole. The department of correction shall create sufficient programming opportunities, such that lack of access to programming is not the primary cause in delaying parole eligibility. The department shall promulgate rules to include case plan development upon entry into prison and a current risk assessment before all parole hearings.

By February 1, 2015, and by February 1 of each year thereafter, the department of correction and the commission shall submit a report to the legislature and governor that describes the most common reasons for delay or denial of release, including statistical data supporting the conclusions of the report.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-223, as added by 1980, ch. 297, § 6, p. 768; am. 1985, ch. 122, § 6, p. 296; am. 1986, ch. 232, § 5, p. 638; am. 1989, ch. 369, § 1, p. 926; am. 1993, ch. 106, § 1, p. 271; am. 1998, ch. 327, § 1, p. 1055; am. 1999, ch. 326, § 1, p. 834; am. 2000, ch. 368, § 3, p. 1219; am. 2006, ch. 251, § 1, p. 760; am. 2013, ch. 241, § 1, p. 569; am. 2014, ch. 150, § 12, p. 414; am. 2017, ch. 182, § 4, p. 414.

§ 20-224. Information regarding prisoners to be secured.

Within six (6) months after his admission and at such intervals thereafter as it may determine, the board shall secure all pertinent available information regarding each prisoner, including the circumstances of his offense, his previous social history and criminal record, his conduct, employment and attitude in prison, and reports of such physical and mental examinations as have been made to assist the board in prescribing treatment for such person while in confinement and to assist the commission in its deliberations. The board and the commission shall attempt to inform themselves as to such inmate as a personality and may seek from the sentencing judge, prosecuting attorney, defense counsel and law enforcement authorities such information of which they may be possessed relative to the convicted person and the crime for which he was committed. An electronic recording or transcript of the comments and arguments required to be recorded by section 19-2515, Idaho Code, shall be submitted to the board, made available to the commission, and shall be considered by the commission in making a parole or commutation decision with respect to the prisoner.

The board of correction shall use a validated risk assessment to determine, for each prisoner, the risk of reoffense and suitability for release. For purposes of this subsection, “validated risk assessment” means an actuarial tool that has been validated in Idaho to determine the likelihood of the prisoner engaging in future criminal behavior. The board shall select a research-based risk assessment and shall validate the accuracy of the risk assessment at least every five (5) years in consultation with the commission. Assessments shall be performed by department staff who are trained and certified in the use of the risk assessment. The commission shall promulgate rules in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, to ensure that risk assessment is used in determining parole, the benefit of holding a prisoner in prison to complete programming versus releasing the prisoner on parole to complete programming in the community and in setting conditions for parole supervision.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 24, p. 59; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 7, p. 768; am. 1984, ch. 230, § 2, p. 549; am. 2014, ch. 150, § 13, p. 414.

§ 20-225. Payment for cost of supervision.

Any person under state probation or parole supervision shall be required to contribute not more than seventy-five dollars ($75.00) per month as determined by the board of correction. Costs of supervision are the direct and indirect costs incurred by the department of correction to supervise probationers and parolees, including tests to determine drug and alcohol use, books and written materials to support rehabilitation efforts, and monitoring of physical location through the use of technology. Any failure to pay such contribution shall constitute grounds for the revocation of probation by the court or the revocation of parole by the commission for pardons and parole. The division of probation and parole in the department of correction may exempt a person from the payment of all or any part of the foregoing contribution if it finds any of the following factors to exist:

The offender has diligently attempted but been unable to obtain employment.

The offender has a disability affecting employment, as determined by a physical, psychological or psychiatric examination acceptable to the division of probation and parole.

Money collected as a fee for services will be placed in the probation and parole receipts revenue fund, which is hereby created in the dedicated fund in the state treasury, and utilized to provide supervision for clients. Moneys in the probation and parole receipts revenue fund may be expended only after appropriation by the legislature. This section shall not restrict the court from ordering the payment of other costs and fees that, by law, may be imposed on persons who have been found guilty of or have pled guilty to a criminal offense, including those who have been placed on probation or parole.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-225, as added by 1984, ch. 187, § 1, p. 436; am. 2003, ch. 130, § 1, p. 383; am. 2005, ch. 68, § 1, p. 233; am. 2010, ch. 235, § 8, p. 542; am. 2011, ch. 73, § 1, p. 155; am. 2012, ch. 109, § 3, p. 299.

§ 20-225A. Payment for interstate compact application.

Any person under state probation or parole supervision who applies for a transfer of supervision to another state shall be required to post an application fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

Money collected as a fee for services and compact administration shall be placed in the probation and parole receipts account, which is hereby created in the dedicated fund in the state treasury, and shall be utilized to provide supervision for offenders. Moneys in the probation and parole receipts account may be expended only after appropriation by the legislature.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-225A, as added by 2003, ch. 25, § 1, p. 94.

§ 20-226. Records of prisoners.

The state board of correction shall cause a complete record to be kept of every prisoner committed to its custody. Such record shall be organized in accordance with the most modern method of filing and indexing so that there will always be immediately available a complete history on each prisoner. Such records shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 26, p. 59; am. 1970, ch. 143, § 9, p. 425; am. 1990, ch. 213, § 15, p. 480; am. 2015, ch. 141, § 23, p. 379.

§ 20-227. Arrest of parolee, probationer or person under drug court or mental health court supervision without warrant — Agent’s warrant — Detention — Report to commission or court.

Any parole or probation officer may arrest a parolee, probationer, or person under drug court or mental health court supervision without a warrant, or may deputize any other officer with power of arrest to do so, by giving such officer a written statement hereafter referred to as an agent’s warrant, setting forth that the parolee, probationer, or person under drug court or mental health court supervision has, in the judgment of said parole or probation officer, violated the conditions of drug court or mental health court or conditions of his parole or probation. The provisions of this section shall apply where the court has provided for the service of discretionary jail time.

Such written statement or agent’s warrant, delivered with the parolee, probationer, or person under drug court or mental health court supervision by the arresting officer to the official in charge of the institution from which the parolee was released, the county jail or other place of detention, shall be sufficient warrant for the detention of the probationer, parolee, or person under drug court or mental health court supervision.

The agent’s warrant issued by the parole or probation officer shall be sufficient authorization for a local law enforcement officer to transport the probationer, parolee, or person under drug court or mental health court supervision to the appropriate jurisdiction to be housed pending appearance before the sentencing court or the commission.

The parole and probation officer shall at once notify the commission, or the court, of the arrest and detention of the parolee, probationer, or person under drug court or mental health court supervision, and shall submit in writing a report showing in what manner the parolee, probationer, or person under drug court or mental health court supervision is alleged to have violated the condition of his or her parole, probation, or drug court or mental health court program. When a probationer is arrested pursuant to an agent’s warrant, the supervising officer shall provide the prosecuting attorney with a copy of the notice of arrest and the report.

In counties where there are misdemeanor probation officers in addition to department of correction parole or probation officers, those officers shall have the same authority conferred upon department of correction parole or probation officers in this section to arrest a misdemeanor probationer without a warrant for misdemeanor probation violations occurring in the officer’s presence as otherwise provided in this section.

When a probationer has been arrested by the supervising officer without a warrant or pursuant to an agent’s warrant, the supervising officer shall submit to the court, to the prosecuting attorney and to the facility where the probationer is detained, a statement of probable cause for the violation. The statement shall be attested to under oath or under penalty of perjury pursuant to section 9-1406, Idaho Code, and shall be submitted within twenty-four (24) hours of the arrest. If a judicial determination of probable cause is not made within forty-eight (48) hours of arrest, then the probationer shall be released.

History.
1947, ch. 23, § 27, p. 59; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 9, p. 768; am. 1994, ch. 424, § 1, p. 1332; am. 1999, ch. 300, § 1, p. 752; am. 2004, ch. 227, § 2, p. 669; am. 2006, ch. 143, § 1, p. 404; am. 2014, ch. 150, § 14, p. 414.

§ 20-228. Conditions of parole to be specified in writing — Warrant for arrest of suspected violators — Effect of suspension and arrest.

The commission for pardons and parole, in releasing a person on parole, shall specify in writing the conditions of parole, and a copy of such conditions shall be given to the person paroled. The commission shall include in the conditions of parole a requirement that the defendant enter into and comply with an agreement of supervision with the board of correction. The agreement of supervision shall include provisions setting forth the potential sanctions for a violation of the conditions imposed and potential rewards for compliance with the conditions imposed, as such sanctions and rewards are set forth in rules of the board. Whenever the commission finds that a parolee may have violated the conditions of parole, the written order of the commission, signed by a member or members of the commission or the executive director, shall be sufficient warrant for any law enforcement officer to take into custody such person, and it is hereby made the duty of all sheriffs, police, constables, parole and probation officers, prison officials and other peace officers, to execute such order. Such warrant shall serve to suspend the person’s parole until a determination on the merits of the allegations of the violation has been made pursuant to a revocation hearing. From and after the issuance of the warrant and suspension of the parole of any convicted person and until arrest, the parolee shall be considered a fugitive from justice. Such person so recommitted, except as provided in section 20-229B, Idaho Code, must serve out the sentence, and the time during which such prisoner was out on parole shall not be deemed a part thereof, unless the commission, in its discretion, shall determine otherwise, but nothing herein contained shall prevent the commission from again paroling such prisoners at its discretion.

History.

1947, ch. 53, § 28, p. 59; am. 1970, ch. 105, § 1, p. 263; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 10, p. 768; am. 1994, ch. 171, § 3, p. 382; am. 1998, ch. 327, § 2, p. 1055; am. 2014, ch. 150, § 15, p. 414.

§ 20-228A. Parole subpoena to assist in apprehending parole absconders.

For the purpose of assisting with apprehending individuals on parole who have absconded and for whom the parole commission has issued a warrant of arrest, the director of the department of correction shall have power to issue a subpoena duces tecum to compel the production of writings, documents or records of any type or form, specifically including those stored or transmitted by any electronic or wireless means. If any person or entity to whom such subpoena is directed refuses to produce the documents, writings or records sought, as directed, within seven (7) days of receipt of the subpoena, the director may apply to the district court of the county where the records are located for an order compelling such person or entity to comply with the subpoena. Failure to obey such order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-228A, as added by 2004, ch. 296, § 1, p. 826.

§ 20-229. Parole revocation hearing.

Whenever a paroled prisoner is accused of a violation of parole, other than by absconding supervision or the commission of, and conviction for, a felony or misdemeanor offense under the laws of this state, or any other state, or any federal laws, the parolee shall be entitled to a fair and impartial hearing of such charges within thirty (30) days from the date the accused is served with the charges of the violation of conditions of parole subsequent to arrest and detention. The hearing shall be held before one (1) or more members of the commission for pardons and parole, or before an impartial hearings officer selected by the executive director. Such hearing shall be held at a place or places, within this state, reasonably near the site of the alleged violation or violations of parole. If the parolee has been supervised outside of the state of Idaho and such violations occurred outside of Idaho, the executive director or hearing officer shall determine the location of the hearing.

Whenever a paroled prisoner is accused of a violation of parole by absconding supervision or the commission of, and conviction for, a felony or misdemeanor offense under the laws of this state, or any other state, or any federal laws, the parolee shall be entitled to a fair and impartial hearing within a reasonable time from the date the accused is served with such charges. The location of such hearing shall be determined by the executive director or hearing officer.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-229, as added by 1970, ch. 105, § 3, p. 263; am. 1975, ch. 247, § 1, p. 661; am. 1980, ch. 297, § 11, p. 768; am. 1994, ch. 171, § 4, p. 382.